Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-603
Rule 603. Oath or affirmation.

Before testifying, every witness shall be required to declare that he will testify truthfully, by oath or affirmation administered in a form calculated to awaken his conscience and impress his mind with his duty to do so.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 36.